src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_SUAJA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** suaja:saa
:%^A2UÄ2I V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^RmVow V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%^A2UÄ2I V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^RmVow  V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%>ja K ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** type 2 also suaha
:%^A2UÄ2I INDPRSPL3_jah ;
+Inf:%>ha K ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** type 2 also suaha
:%^A2UÄ2I INDPRSPL3_hah ;

LEXICON V_JIÄJÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** suaja:saa jiäjä:jää
:%{front%} V_JIÄJÄ_01 ;
LEXICON V_JIÄJÄ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** suaja:saa jiäjä:jää
: V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^RmVow V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
: V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^RmVow  V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%>jä K ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** type 2 also jiähä
+Inf:%>hä K ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** type 2 also jiähä
: INDPRSPL3_jäh ;
: INDPRSPL3_häh ;

LEXICON V_VIIJÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** viijä:ve
:%>e%{front%} V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%{front%} V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;	! möin
:%>e%{front%} V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%{front%}  V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;	! möi
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%{front%}%^RmVow%>iijäh K ;
+Inf:%{front%}%^RmVow%>iijä K ;

LEXICON V_PÄITÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** päitä:päde
! gradation: yes
:e%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%}%^WGStem V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_PÄITÄ-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ päitä:päde
! gradation: yes
!:e V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!:%^WGStem V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_VOIJA !!≈ * **@CODE@** voija:voi
:%{back%} V_VOIJA_01 ;
LEXICON V_VOIJA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** voija:voi
: V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^RmVow V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
!: V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:bi K ;
: INDPRTCONNEG_nnuh         ;
: CONDPRS_S_BACK ;
: CONDPRT_nnus ;
: CONDPRTPL3_Danus ;
: POT_nnE_BACK ;
: POTPL3_Daneh ;
: IMPRT_Ga ;
: IMPRTPL3_Dahes ;
: ACT-PRSPRC_AVUAJU ;
: ACT-PRFPRC_nnuH ;
: PSS-PRSPRC_Davu ;
: PSS-PRFPRC_DU ;
: M-INF           ;

:%^RmVow  V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%>ja K ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** type 2 also suaha
: INDPRSPL3_jah ;

LEXICON V_ROIJA !!≈ * **@CODE@** roija:roi
:%{back%} V_ROIJA_01 ;
LEXICON V_ROIJA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** roija:roi
: V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^RmVow V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
: V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^RmVow  V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%>ja K ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** type 2 also suaha
: INDPRSPL3_jah ;

!! jA polysyllabic stem

LEXICON V_SUVAIJA !!≈ * **@CODE@** suvaija:suvai
:%{back%} V-VV_05_SUVAIJA ;

LEXICON V_SUVAIJA-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** suvaija:suvai
:%{back%} V-VV_05_SUVAIJA ;

LEXICON V_SUVAIJA-3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** suvaija:suvai
:%{back%} V-VV_05_SUVAIJA ;

LEXICON V_EMÄNDÖIJÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** emändöijä:emändöi
:%{front%} V-VV_05_EMÄNDÖIJÄ ;

!LEXICON V_EMÄNDÖIJÄ-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ emändöijä:emändöi
!: V-VV_05_EMÄNDÖIJÄ ;

!LEXICON V_EMÄNDÖIJÄ-3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ emändöijä:emändöi
!: V-VV_05_EMÄNDÖIJÄ ;

!! ### Verbs ending VtA (-AtA, -OtA, -UtA, -etA,-itA)
!! The verb has both vowel and consonant stem.

!! -AtA

LEXICON V_ALLATA !!≈ * **@CODE@** allata:alga
! gradation: yes
:%^A2UÄ2Y%>a%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!:%^A2U%>a%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%}%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_ALLATA-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ allata:alga
!! gradation: yes
!:%^A2U%>a V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!:%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_AVATA !!≈ * **@CODE@** avata:ava
! gradation: no
:%{back%}%^A2U%>a V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_AVATA-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ avata:ava
!! gradation: no
!:%^A2U%>a V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

! hapata, happanen, happanou

!LEXICON V_TYPÄTÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** typätä:typpä
!:%{front%} #;

LEXICON V_BÖVVÄTÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** bövvätä:böygä
! gradation: yes
:%^Ä2I%>ä%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%}%^WGStem V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_BÖVVÄTÄ-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ bövvätä:böygä
!! gradation: yes
!:%^Ä2I%>ä V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!:%^WGStem V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_HYRRÄTÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** hyrrätä:hyrrä
! gradation: no
:%^Ä2I%>ä%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{front%} V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!LEXICON V_HYRRÄTÄ-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ hyrrätä:hyrrä
! gradation: no
!:%^Ä2I%>ä V-VV_04_FRONT-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_FRONT-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

!! -etA

LEXICON V_RUVETA !!≈ * **@CODE@** ruveta:rube
! gradation: yes
:%>e%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;
! ie-stem, rubien

LEXICON V_RUVETA-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** ruveta:rube
! gradation: yes
:%>e%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%}%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_LANGETA !!≈ * **@CODE@** langeta:lange
! gradation: no
:e%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;
! langeta, halleta, katketa has both ie- and ne-stems, langien/langenen, langein/langenin

!LEXICON V_LANGETA-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ langeta:lange
! gradation: no
!:e V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
!: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_ALETA !!≈ * **@CODE@** aleta:ale (alenou)
:%{back%} V-VV_06_BACK ;
:%{back%} V_ALETA_01 ;
LEXICON V_ALETA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** aleta:ale (alenou)
+Act:ne INDPRSSG1 ;
+Act:ne INDPRSSG2 ;
+Act:no INDPRSSG3_BACK ;
+Act:ne INDPRSPL1_BACK ;
+Act:ne INDPRSPL2 ;
+Act: INDPRSPL3_tAh ;
+Act:ne INDPRSCONNEG ;
+Act:n INDPRTSG1     ;
+Act:n INDPRTSG2     ;
+Act:n INDPRTSG3     ;
+Act:n INDPRTPL1     ;
+Act:n INDPRTPL2     ;
+Act: INDPRTPL3_ttih     ;
+Act+Ind+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:%>n%{lnrs%}%{uy%}t K ;
+Act+Ind+PrfPrc:%>n%{lnrs%}uh K ;
+Act+Ind+PrfPrcPl3:%>ttu K ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nnuh ; !!
+Act: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_ttu ;
+Act:n CONDPRS_IS ;
!+Act:%>d CONDPRSPL3 ;
!+Act:%>du%^WGStem CONDPRT ;
!+Act:%>da CONDPRTPL3_DAnUs ;

!LEXICON V_ALETA-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aleta:ale (alenou)
!: V-VV_06_BACK ;

LEXICON V_VÄHETÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** vähetä:vähe (vähenöy)
:%{front%} V-VV_06_FRONT ;
:%{front%} V_VÄHETÄ_01 ;
